North Carolina, session 2025, SB316.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. GREATER TRANSPARENCY IN HOSPITAL AND AMBULATORY
SURGICAL FACILITY HEALTHCARE COSTS
SECTION 1.1. Article 11B of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes reads as
rewritten:
"Article 11B.
"Transparency in Health Care Costs.
"Part 1. Health Care Cost Reduction and Transparency Act of 2013.
"§ 131E-214.11. Title.
This article Part shall be known as the Health Care Cost Reduction and Transparency Act of
2013.
…
"§ 131E-214.13. Disclosure of prices for most frequently reported DRGs, CPTs, and
HCPCSs.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Article:Part:
(1) Ambulatory surgical facility. – A facility licensed under Part 4 of Article 6 of
this Chapter.
(2) Commission. – The North Carolina Medical Care Commission.
(2a) CPT. – Current Procedural Terminology.
(2b) DRG. – Diagnostic Related Group.
(2c) HCPCS. – The Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System.
(3) Health insurer. – An entity that writes a health benefit plan and is one of the
following:
a. An insurance company under Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
b. A service corporation under Article 65 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
c. A health maintenance organization under Article 67 of Chapter 58 of
the General Statutes.
d. A third-party administrator of one or more group health plans, as
defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)).
(4) Hospital. – A medical care facility licensed under Article 5 of this Chapter or
under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
(5) Public or private third party. – Includes the State, the federal government,
employers, health insurers, third-party administrators, and managed care
organizations.
(6) Statewide data processor. – As defined in G.S. 131E-214.1.
(b) Beginning with the reporting period ending September 30, 2015, and annually
thereafter, Quarterly Report on Most Frequently Reported DRGs for Inpatients. – On a quarterly
basis, each hospital shall provide to the Department of Health and Human Services statewide
Page 2 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
data processor, utilizing electronic health records software, the following information about the
100 most frequently reported admissions by DRG for inpatients as established by the
Department:
(1) The amount that will be charged to a patient for each DRG if all charges are
paid in full without a public or private third party paying for any portion of
the charges. In calculating this amount, each hospital shall include charges for
each billable item and service associated with the DRG regardless of whether
the health service is performed by a physician or nonphysician practitioner
employed by the hospital.
(2) The average negotiated settlement on the amount that will be charged to a
patient required to be provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The amount of Medicaid reimbursement for each DRG, including claims and
pro rata supplemental payments.
(4) The amount of Medicare reimbursement for each DRG.
(5) For each of the five largest health insurers providing payment to the hospital
on behalf of insureds and teachers and State employees, the range and the
average of the amount of payment made for each DRG. Prior to providing this
information to the Department statewide data processor, each hospital shall
redact the names of the health insurers and any other information that would
otherwise identify the health insurers.
A hospital shall not be required to report the information required by this subsection for any
of the 100 most frequently reported admissions where the reporting of that information
reasonably could lead to the identification of the person or persons admitted to the hospital in
violation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) or
other federal law.
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules on or before March 1, 2016, to ensure that
subsection (b) of this section is properly implemented and that hospitals report this information
to the Department in a uniform manner. The rules shall include all of the following:
(1) The method by which the Department shall determine the 100 most frequently
reported DRGs for inpatients for which hospitals must provide the data set out
in subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Specific categories by which hospitals shall be grouped for the purpose of
disclosing this information to the public on the Department's Internet Web
site.
(d) Beginning with the reporting period ending September 30, 2015, and annually
thereafter, Quarterly Report on Total Costs for the Most Common Surgical and Imaging
Procedures. – On a quarterly basis, each hospital and ambulatory surgical facility shall provide
to the Department,statewide data processor, utilizing electronic health records software,
information on the total costs for the 20 most common surgical procedures and the 20 most
common imaging procedures, by volume, performed in hospital outpatient settings or in
ambulatory surgical facilities, along with the related CPT and HCPCS codes. In providing
information on total costs, each hospital and ambulatory surgical facility shall include the costs
for each billable item and service associated with the procedure regardless of whether the health
service is performed by a physician or nonphysician practitioner employed by the hospital or
ambulatory surgical facility. Hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall report this
information in the same manner as required by subdivisions (b)(1) through (5) of this section,
provided that hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall not be required to report the
information required by this subsection where the reporting of that information reasonably could
lead to the identification of the person or persons admitted to the hospital in violation of the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) or other federal
law.
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) The Commission shall adopt rules on or before March 1, 2016, to ensure that
subsection (d) of this section is properly implemented and that hospitals and ambulatory surgical
facilities report this information to the Department in a uniform manner. The rules shall include
the method by which the Department shall determine the 20 most common surgical procedures
and the 20 most common imaging procedures for which the hospitals and ambulatory surgical
facilities must provide the data set out in subsection (d) of this section.
(e1) The Commission shall adopt rules to establish and define no fewer than 10 quality
measures for licensed hospitals and licensed ambulatory surgical facilities.
(f) Upon request of a patient for a particular DRG, imaging procedure, or surgery
procedure reported in this section, a hospital or ambulatory surgical facility shall provide the
information required by subsection (b) or subsection (d) of this section to the patient in writing,
either electronically or by mail, within three business days after receiving the request.
(f1) Commission Rules. – The Commission shall adopt rules to accomplish all of the
following:
(1) To ensure that subsection (b) of this section is properly implemented and that
hospitals report this information to the statewide data processor in a uniform
manner. The rules shall include the method by which the statewide data
processor shall determine the 100 most frequently reported DRGs for
inpatients for which hospitals must provide the data set out in subsection (b)
of this section and the specific categories by which hospitals shall be grouped
for the purpose of disclosing this information to the public on the Department's
website.
(2) To ensure that subsection (d) of this section is properly implemented and that
hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities report this information to the
statewide data processor in a uniform manner. The rules shall include the
method by which the statewide data processor shall determine the 20 most
common surgical procedures and the 20 most common imaging procedures
for which the hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities must provide the
data set out in subsection (d) of this section.
(3) To establish and define no fewer than 10 quality measures for licensed
hospitals and licensed ambulatory surgical facilities.
(4) To establish procedures for the statewide data processor to receive the data
required by subsections (b) and (d) of this section and submit that data to the
Department for publication on the Department's website.
(g) G.S. 150B-21.3 does not apply to rules adopted under subsections (c) and (e)
subdivision (f1)(1) or subdivision (f1)(2) of this section. A rule adopted under subsections (c)
and (e) subdivision (f1)(1) or subdivision (f1)(2) of this section becomes effective on the last day
of the month following the month in which the rule is approved by the Rules Review
Commission.
…
"§ 131E-214.18. Penalty for noncompliance.
The Department may impose a civil penalty on any hospital or ambulatory surgical facility
that fails to comply with the requirements of this Part. For each day of violation, the amount of
the civil penalty shall not be (i) less than one hundredth of one percent (.01%) of the annual salary
of the chief executive officer of the noncompliant hospital or ambulatory surgical facility or (ii)
greater than two thousand dollars ($2,000). This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or
civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may
choose to impose on the facility. The Department shall remit the clear proceeds of civil penalties
assessed pursuant to this section to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2."
SECTION 1.1A. G.S. 131E-214.4(a) reads as rewritten:
Page 4 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(a) A statewide data processor shall perform the following duties:
…
(8) Receive data required to be submitted by hospitals under G.S. 131E-214.13(b)
and by hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities under G.S. 131E-214.13(d)
and submit that data to the Department of Health and Human Services
(Department) for publication on the Department's website."
SECTION 1.2. This Part becomes effective on the later of January 1, 2026, or the
date the rules adopted by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission under
G.S. 131E-214.13(f1)(2) take effect, and G.S. 131E-214.18, as enacted by this Part, applies to
acts occurring on or after that date. The Commission shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when
the rules required under G.S. 131E-214.13(f1)(1) and (f1)(2) take effect.

PART II. GREATER TRANSPARENCY IN HEALTHCARE PROVIDER BILLING
PRACTICES
SECTION 2.1. Article 11B of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as amended by
Part I of this act, is amended by adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2. Transparency in Healthcare Provider Billing Practices.
"§ 131E-214.25. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Health benefit plan. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167, or under the laws of
another state or the federal government.
(2) Healthcare provider. – As defined in G.S. 90-410.
(3) Insurer. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
"§ 131E-214.30. Fair notice requirements; heath service facilities.
(a) Services Provided at a Participating Health Service Facility. – At the time a health
service facility participating in an insurer's healthcare provider network (i) treats an insured
individual for anything other than screening and stabilization in accordance with G.S. 58-3-190,
(ii) admits an insured individual to receive emergency services, (iii) schedules a procedure for
nonemergency services for an insured individual, or (iv) seeks prior authorization from an insurer
for the provision of nonemergency services to an insured individual, the health service facility
shall provide the insured individual with a written disclosure containing all of the following
information:
(1) Services may be provided at the health service facility for which the insured
individual may receive a separate bill.
(2) Certain healthcare providers may be called upon to render care to the insured
individual during the course of treatment and those healthcare providers may
not have contracts with the insured's insurer and are considered to be
nonparticipating healthcare providers in the insurer's healthcare provider
network. Any nonparticipating healthcare providers shall be identified in the
written disclosure using the individual's healthcare provider's name and
practice name as used on the applicable health service facility's or healthcare
provider's credentials or name badge.
(3) Text, using a bold or other distinguishable font, that states that certain
consumer protections available to the insured individual when services are
rendered by a health service facility or healthcare provider participating in the
insurer's healthcare provider network may not be applicable when services are
rendered by a nonparticipating healthcare provider.
(b) Emergency Services Provided at Nonparticipating Health Service Facilities. – As
soon as practicable after a health service facility begins the provision of emergency services to
an insured individual, if the facility does not have a contract with the applicable insurer, then the
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
health service facility shall provide the insured individual with a written disclosure containing
all of the following:
(1) A statement that the health service facility does not have a provider network
contract with the applicable insurer and is considered to be a nonparticipating
provider.
(2) Text, using a bold or other distinguishable font, that states that certain
consumer protections available to the insured individual when services are
rendered by a health service facility or healthcare provider participating in the
insurer's healthcare provider network may not be applicable when services are
rendered by a nonparticipating health service facility.
"§ 131E-214.31. Fair notice requirements; healthcare providers.
At the time a healthcare provider not participating in an insurer's healthcare provider network
(i) treats an insured individual for anything other than screening and stabilization in accordance
with G.S. 58-3-190, (ii) schedules an appointment or procedure for nonemergency services for
an insured individual, or (iii) seeks prior authorization from an insurer for the provision of
nonemergency services to an insured individual, the healthcare provider shall provide the insured
individual with a written disclosure containing all of the following information:
(1) A statement that the healthcare provider is not in the insurer's healthcare
provider network applicable to the individual.
(2) Text, using a bold or other distinguishable font, that states that certain
consumer protections available to the insured individual when services are
rendered by a healthcare provider participating in the insurer's healthcare
provider network may not be applicable when services are rendered by a
nonparticipating healthcare provider.
"§ 131E-214.35. Penalties.
A healthcare provider's repeated failure to comply with this Article shall indicate a general
business practice that is deemed an unfair and deceptive trade practice and is actionable under
Chapter 75 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this Article forecloses other remedies available
under law or equity."
SECTION 2.2.(a) G.S. 58-3-200(a)(1) and G.S. 58-3-200(a)(2) are repealed.
SECTION 2.2.(b) G.S. 58-3-200(a), as amended by subsection (a) of this section,
reads as rewritten:
"(a) Definitions. – As used The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(3) Clinical laboratory. – An entity in which services are performed to provide
information or materials for use in the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of
disease or assessment of a medical or physical condition.
(4) Healthcare provider. – As defined in G.S. 90-410."
SECTION 2.2.(c) G.S. 58-3-200(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Services Outside Provider Networks. – No insurer shall penalize an insured or subject
an insured to the out-of-network benefit levels offered under the insured's approved health benefit
plan, including an insured receiving an extended or standing referral under G.S. 58-3-223, unless
contracting health care healthcare providers able to meet health needs of the insured are
reasonably available to the insured without unreasonable delay. Upon notice or request from the
insured, the insurer shall determine whether a healthcare provider able to meet the needs of the
insured is available to the insured without unreasonable delay by reference to the insured's
location and the specific medical needs of the insured."
SECTION 2.3. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
healthcare services provided on or after that date and to contracts issued, renewed, or amended
on or after that date.

Page 6 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART III. GREATER FAIRNESS IN BILLING AND COLLECTIONS PRACTICES
FOR HOSPITALS AND AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITIES
SECTION 3.1.(a) Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article 11C to be entitled "Fair Billing and Collections Practices for Hospitals and Ambulatory
Surgical Facilities."
SECTION 3.1.(b) G.S. 131E-91 is recodified as G.S. 131E-214.50 under Article
11C of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as created by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.1.(c) G.S. 131E-214.50(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall abide by the following reasonable
collections practices:
…
(1a) A hospital or ambulatory surgical facility shall not refer a patient's unpaid bill
to a collections agency, entity, or other assignee unless it has first presented
an itemized list of charges to the patient detailing, in language comprehensible
to an ordinary layperson, the specific nature of the charges or expenses
incurred by the patient.
…."
SECTION 3.2. Article 11C of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as created by
Section 3.1(a) of this act, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-214.52. Patient's right to a good-faith estimate.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) CMS. – The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) Facility. – A hospital or ambulatory surgical facility licensed under this
Chapter.
(3) Items and services. – All items and services, including individual items and
services and service packages, that could be provided by a facility to a patient
in connection with an inpatient admission or an outpatient visit for which the
facility has established a standard charge. Examples include, but are not
limited to, all of the following:
a. Supplies and procedures.
b. Room and board.
c. Fees for use of the facility or other items.
d. Professional charges for services of physicians and nonphysician
practitioners who are employed by the facility.
e. Professional charges for services of physicians and nonphysician
practitioners who are not employed by the facility.
f. Any other items or services for which a facility has established a
standard charge.
(4) Service package. – An aggregation of individual items and services into a
single service with a single charge.
(5) Shoppable service. – A non-urgent service that can be scheduled by a patient
in advance. The term includes all CMS-specified shoppable services plus as
many additional facility-selected shoppable services as are necessary for a
combined total of at least 300 shoppable services.
(b) Good-Faith Estimate. – Upon request of any patient for a good-faith estimate for a
shoppable service, the facility shall provide to the patient, in writing, at least three business days
prior to the date the patient schedules the shoppable service, an itemized list of expected charges,
in language comprehensible to an ordinary layperson, that the patient will be obligated to pay for
all items and services related to the shoppable service. The good-faith estimate shall include the
Diagnostic Related Group (DRG), Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), or Healthcare
Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code for each expected charge.
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) In any case in which a patient has requested a good-faith estimate from a facility for
a shoppable service, the patient's final bill for that shoppable service shall not exceed more than
five percent (5%) of the good-faith estimate provided to the patient pursuant to this section.
(d) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this section."
SECTION 3.3. This Part becomes effective on the later of January 1, 2026, or the
date the rules adopted by the Department under G.S. 131E-214.52 take effect and applies to acts
occurring on or after that date. The Department shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when the rules
required under G.S. 131E-214.52 take effect.

PART IV. GREATER PROTECTION FOR HEALTHCARE CONSUMERS FROM
FACILITY FEES
SECTION 4.1.(a) Article 11C of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as created
by Section 3.1(a) of this act, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-214.54. Facility fees.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Ambulatory surgical facility. – As defined in G.S. 131E-176.
(2) Campus. – Any of the following:
a. The main building of a hospital.
b. The physical area immediately adjacent to a hospital's main building.
c. Other structures not contiguous to the main building of a hospital that
are within 250 yards of the main building.
d. Any other area that has been determined to be part of a hospital's
campus by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(3) Facility fee. – Any fee charged or billed by a health care provider for
outpatient services provided in a hospital-based facility that is (i) intended to
compensate the health care provider for the operational expenses of the health
care provider, (ii) separate and distinct from a professional fee, and (iii)
charged regardless of the modality through which the health care services
were provided.
(4) Health care provider. – As defined in G.S. 90-410.
(5) Health systems. – A parent corporation of one or more hospitals and any entity
affiliated with that parent corporation through ownership, governance,
membership, or other means, or a hospital and any entity affiliated with that
hospital through ownership, governance, membership, or other means.
(6) Hospital. – Any hospital as defined in G.S. 90-176(13) and any facility
licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
(7) Hospital-based facility. – A facility that is owned or operated, in whole or in
part, by a hospital and at which hospital or professional medical services are
provided.
(8) Professional fee. – Any fee charged or billed by a provider for hospital or
professional medical services provided in a hospital-based facility.
(9) Remote location of a hospital. – A hospital-based facility that is created,
acquired, or purchased by a hospital or health system for the purpose of
furnishing inpatient services under the name, ownership, and financial and
administrative control of the hospital.
(b) Limits on Facility Fees. – The following limitations are applicable to facility fees:
(1) No health care provider shall charge, bill, or collect a facility fee unless the
services are provided on a hospital's main campus, at a remote location of a
hospital, at a facility that includes an emergency department, or at an
ambulatory surgical facility.
Page 8 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Regardless of where the services are provided, no health care provider shall
charge, bill, or collect a facility fee for outpatient evaluation and management
services, or any other outpatient, diagnostic, or imaging services identified by
the Department.
(c) Identification of Services. – The Department shall annually identify services subject
to the limitations on facility fees provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section that
may reliably be provided safely and effectively in non-hospital settings.
(d) Reporting Requirements. – Each hospital and health system shall submit a report to
the Department annually on July 1. The report shall be published on the Department's website
and shall contain the following:
(1) The name and full address of each facility owned or operated by the hospital
or health system that provides services for which a facility fee is charged or
billed.
(2) The number of patient visits at each such hospital-based facility for which a
facility fee was charged or billed.
(3) The number, total amount, and range of allowable facility fees paid at each
facility by Medicare, Medicaid, and private insurance.
(4) For each hospital-based facility and for the hospital or health system as a
whole, the total amount billed, and the total revenue received from facility
fees.
(5) The top 10 procedures or services, identified by Current Procedural
Terminology (CPT) category I codes, provided by the hospital or health
system that generated the greatest amount of facility fee gross revenue; the
number of each of these 10 procedures or services provided; the gross and net
revenue totals for each such procedure or service; and the total net amount of
revenue received by the hospital or health system derived from facility fees
for each procedure or service.
(6) Any other information the Department may require.
(e) Enforcement. – This section shall be enforced as follows:
(1) Any violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive trade practice
in violation of G.S. 75-1.1 and is subject to all of the enforcement and penalty
provisions of an unfair or deceptive trade practice under Article 1 of Chapter
75 of the General Statutes.
(2) In addition to the remedies described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, any
health care provider who violates any provision of this section shall be subject
to an administrative penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
per occurrence."
SECTION 4.1.(b) No later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall adopt rules necessary to implement G.S. 131E-214.54, as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 131E-214.54, as enacted by Section 4.1(a) of this Part, becomes
effective January 1, 2026, or on the date the rules adopted by the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to Section 4.1(b) of this Part become effective, whichever is later, and
applies to healthcare services provided on or after that date. The Department shall notify the
Revisor of Statutes when the rules required under Section 4.1(b) of this Part become effective.

PART V. STATE AUDITOR REVIEW OF HEALTH SERVICE FACILITY PRICES
SECTION 5.1. G.S. 147-64.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Responsibilities. – The Auditor is responsible for the following acts and activities:
…
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(24) The Auditor shall periodically examine (i) health service facilities, as defined
in G.S. 131E-176, that are recipients of State funds and (ii) facilities licensed
under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes that are recipients of State funds
and report findings to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services on April 1, 2026, and periodically thereafter. The report
must include at least the following:
a. The prices that the health service facility charges patients whose
insurance is out-of-network or who are uninsured.
b. To what extent the health service facility is transparent about the prices
described in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision."

PART VI. ENHANCEMENTS TO EMPLOYEE SAFETY BY ALLOWING FOR THE
REMOVAL OF CERTAIN EMPLOYEE DETAILS FROM HEALTH INSURANCE
APPEALS AND GRIEVANCE REVIEWS
SECTION 6.1.(a) G.S. 58-50-61(k) reads as rewritten:
"(k) Nonexpedited Appeals. – Within three business days after receiving a request for a
standard, nonexpedited appeal, the insurer or its URO shall provide the covered person with the
name, address, and telephone number of the coordinator and information on how and where to
submit written material. material for the appeal, including contact information for the insurer.
For standard, nonexpedited appeals, the insurer or its URO shall give written notification of the
decision, in clear terms, to the covered person and the covered person's provider within 30 days
after the insurer receives the request for an appeal. If the decision is not in favor of the covered
person, the written decision shall contain:contain all of the following information:
(1) The professional qualifications and licensure of the person or persons
reviewing the appeal.
(2) A statement of the reviewers' understanding of the reason for the covered
person's basis of the appeal.
(3) The reviewers' insurer's or URO's decision in clear terms and the medical
rationale in sufficient detail for the covered person to respond further to the
insurer's position.
…."
SECTION 6.1.(b) G.S. 58-50-62(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) First-Level Grievance Review. – A covered person or a covered person's provider
acting on the covered person's behalf may submit a grievance. All of the following shall apply to
a first-level grievance review:
(1) The insurer does not have is not required to allow a covered person to attend
the first-level grievance review. A covered person may submit written
material. Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, within three
business days after receiving a grievance, the insurer shall provide the covered
person with the name, address, and telephone number of the coordinator and
information on where and how to submit written material.material for the
first-level grievance review, including contact information for the insurer.
(2) An insurer shall issue a written decision, in clear terms, to the covered person
and, if applicable, to the covered person's provider, within 30 days after
receiving a grievance. The person or persons reviewing the grievance shall not
be the same person or persons who initially handled the matter that is the
subject of the grievance and, if the issue is a clinical one, at least one of whom
shall be a medical doctor with appropriate expertise to evaluate the matter.
Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, if the decision is not
in favor of the covered person, the written decision issued in a first-level
grievance review shall contain:contain all of the following information:
Page 10 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The professional qualifications and licensure of the person or persons
reviewing the grievance.
b. A statement of the reviewers' understanding basis of the grievance.
c. The reviewers' insurer's decision in clear terms and the contractual
basis or medical rationale in sufficient detail for the covered person to
respond further to the insurer's position.
…."
SECTION 6.1.(c) G.S. 58-50-62(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Second-Level Grievance Review. – An insurer shall establish a second-level
grievance review process for covered persons who are dissatisfied with the first-level grievance
review decision or a utilization review appeal decision. A covered person or the covered person's
provider acting on the covered person's behalf may submit a second-level grievance. All of the
following shall apply to a second-level grievance review:
(1) An insurer shall, within 10 business days after receiving a request for a
second-level grievance review, make known to provide the covered
person:person all of the following information:
a. The name, address, and telephone number of a person designated to
coordinate the grievance review for the insurer.Information on how
and where to submit written material for the second-level grievance
review, including contact information for the insurer.
…."
SECTION 6.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law.

PART VII. ELIMINATION OF CERTIFICATE OF NEED REVIEW FOR INPATIENT
REHABILITATION SERVICES, REHABILITATION FACILITIES, AND
REHABILITATION BEDS
SECTION 7.1. G.S. 131E-176 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-176. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(9a) Health service. – An organized, interrelated activity that is medical,
diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or a combination thereof of these and
that is integral to the prevention of disease or the clinical management of an
individual who is sick or injured or who has a disability. "Health service" does
not include administrative and other activities that are not integral to clinical
management.
(9b) Health service facility. – A hospital; long-term care hospital; rehabilitation
facility; nursing home facility; adult care home; kidney disease treatment
center, including freestanding hemodialysis units; intermediate care facility
for individuals with intellectual disabilities; home health agency office;
diagnostic center; hospice office, hospice inpatient facility, hospice residential
care facility; and ambulatory surgical facility.
(9c) Health service facility bed. – A bed licensed for use in a health service facility
in the categories of (i) acute care beds; (iii) rehabilitation beds; (iv) (ii) nursing
home beds; (v) (iii) intermediate care beds for individuals with intellectual
disabilities; (vii) (iv) hospice inpatient facility beds; (viii) (v) hospice
residential care facility beds; (ix) (vi) adult care home beds; and (x) (vii)
long-term care hospital beds.
…
(13) Hospital. – A public or private institution which that is primarily engaged in
providing to inpatients, by or under supervision of physicians, diagnostic
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
services and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment, and care of
injured, disabled, or sick persons, or rehabilitation services for the
rehabilitation of injured, disabled, or sick persons. The term includes all
facilities licensed pursuant to G.S. 131E-77, except rehabilitation facilities
and long-term care hospitals.
…
(17a) Nursing care. – Any of the following:
a. Skilled nursing care and related services for residents who require
medical or nursing care.
b. Rehabilitation services services, other than those provided at an
inpatient rehabilitation facility, for the rehabilitation of individuals
who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
c. Health-related care and services provided on a regular basis to
individuals who because of their mental or physical condition require
care and services above the level of room and board, which can be
made available to them only through institutional facilities.
These are services which are not primarily for the care and treatment of
mental diseases.
…
(22) Rehabilitation facility. – A public or private inpatient facility which is
operated for the primary purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of
individuals with disabilities through an integrated program of medical and
other services which are provided under competent, professional
supervision.A facility that has been classified and designated as an inpatient
rehabilitation facility by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
pursuant to Part 412 of Subchapter B of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of
Federal Regulations.
…."

PART VIII. UPDATED HEALTH INSURER PRIOR AUTHORIZATION
REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 58-50-61 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-50-61. Utilization review.
(a) Definitions. – As used The following definitions apply in this section, in
G.S. 58-50-62, and in Part 4 of this Article, the term:Article:
…
(2a) Course of treatment. – A prescribed order or ordered treatment protocol for a
specific covered person with a specific condition that is outlined and decided
upon ahead of time with the covered person and healthcare provider and
approved by the insurer or utilization review organization when prospective
review is applicable.
…
(8) "Health care provider" means any person who is licensed, registered, or
certified under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or the laws of another state
to provide health care services in the ordinary care of business or practice or
a profession or in an approved education or training program; a health care
facility as defined in G.S. 131E-176(9b) or the laws of another state to operate
as a health care facility; or a pharmacy.Healthcare provider. – As defined in
G.S. 90-410.
…
Page 12 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(14a) Prior authorization. – The process by which insurers and UROs determine
coverage on the basis of medical necessity and/or covered benefits prior to the
rendering of those services.
…
(16a) Urgent health care service. – A health care service, including mental and
behavioral health care services, with respect to which the application of the
time periods for making an urgent care determination that, in the opinion of a
healthcare provider with knowledge of the covered person's medical
condition, meets either of the following criteria:
a. Could seriously jeopardize the life or health of the covered person or
the ability of the covered person to regain maximum function.
b. Would subject the covered person to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without the care or treatment that is the subject
of the utilization review.
…
(f) Time Lines for Prospective and Concurrent Utilization Reviews Based Upon Type of
Health Care Service. – As used in this subsection, the term "necessary information" includes the
results of any patient examination, clinical evaluation, or second opinion that may be required.
Prospective and concurrent determinations shall be communicated to The time line for
completion of a prospective or concurrent utilization review is as follows:
(1) Non-urgent health care services. – If an insurer requires a prior authorization
review of a healthcare service, then the insurer or its URO shall both render a
prior authorization review determination or noncertification and notify the
covered person and the covered person's provider within three business days
after the insurer obtains all necessary information about the admission,
procedure, or health care service. to make the prior authorization review
determination or noncertification.
(2) Urgent health care services. – An insurer or its URO shall both render a
utilization review determination or noncertification concerning urgent health
care services and notify the covered person and the covered person's provider
of that utilization review determination or noncertification not later than 24
hours after receiving all necessary information needed to complete the review
of the requested health care services. If the covered person's provider or the
insurer, or the entity conducting the review on behalf of the insurer, do not
both have access to the electronic health records of the covered person, then
this subdivision shall not apply and the utilization review will be subject to
the time line under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(f1) Prior Authorization Determination Notifications. – If an insurer or its URO certifies
a health care service, the insurer shall notify notification shall be sent to the covered person's
provider. For If an insurer or its URO issues a noncertification, the insurer shall notify the covered
person's provider and send then written or electronic confirmation of the noncertification to the
covered person's provider and covered person. In person that is in compliance with subsection
(h) of this section.
(f2) Concurrent Review Liability. – For concurrent reviews, the insurer shall remain liable
for health care healthcare services until the covered person has been notified of the
noncertification.
…
(j1) Requirements Applicable to Appeals Reviews. – All of the following requirements
apply to an appeals review:
(1) Except as otherwise provided, appeals shall be reviewed by a licensed
physician who meets all of the following criteria:
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Possesses a current and valid non-restricted license to practice
medicine in any United States jurisdiction.
b. Has practiced for a period of at least three consecutive years in the
same or similar specialty as a medical doctor who typically manages
the medical condition or disease for which prior authorization review
is required or whose training and experience meets all of the following
criteria:
1. Includes treatment of the same condition as the condition of
the covered person.
2. Includes treatment of complications that may result from the
service or procedure that is the subject of the appeal.
3. Is sufficient for the medical doctor to determine if the service
or procedure is medically necessary or clinically appropriate.
c. Had no direct involvement in making the prior adverse determination
or noncertification that is the subject of the appeal.
d. Has no financial interest, or other conflict of interest, in the outcome
of the appeal.
(2) Appeals initiated by a licensed mental health professional for a service
provided by a licensed mental health professional may be reviewed by a
licensed mental health professional rather than a medical doctor. The
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to the reviewing
licensed mental health professional in the same manner that they apply to a
medical doctor.
(3) The medical doctor or licensed mental health professional shall consider all
known clinical aspects of the healthcare service under review, including all
pertinent medical records and any medical literature that have been provided
by the covered person's provider or by a health care facility.
…
(m) Disclosure of Utilization Review Requirements. – All of the following apply to an
insurer's responsibility to disclose any utilization review procedures:
(1) Coverage and member handbook. – In the certificate of coverage and member
handbook provided to covered persons, an insurer shall include a clear and
comprehensive description of its utilization review procedures, including the
procedures for appealing noncertifications and a statement of the rights and
responsibilities of covered persons, including the voluntary nature of the
appeal process, with respect to those procedures. An insurer shall also include
in the certificate of coverage and the member handbook information about the
availability of assistance from the Department's Health Insurance Smart NC,
including the telephone number and address of the Program. program.
(2) Prospective materials. – An insurer shall include a summary of its utilization
review procedures in materials intended for prospective covered persons.
(3) Membership cards. – An insurer shall print on its membership cards a toll-free
telephone number to call for utilization review purposes.
(4) Website. – An insurer shall make any current prior authorization requirements
and restrictions readily accessible on its website.
(m1) Changes to Prior Authorization. – If an insurer intends either to implement a new
prior authorization review requirement or restriction or to amend an existing requirement or
restriction, then the new or amended requirement shall not be in effect unless and until the
insurer's website has been updated to reflect the new or amended requirement or restriction. A
claim shall not be denied for failure to obtain a prior authorization if the prior authorization
requirement or amended requirement was not in effect on the date of service of the claim.
Page 14 Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(n1) Prior Authorization Determination Validity. – All of the following apply to the length
of time an approved prior authorization shall remain valid under certain circumstances:
(1) If a covered person enrolls in a new health benefit plan offered by the same
insurer under which the prior authorization was approved, then the previously
approved prior authorization remains valid for the initial 90 days of coverage
under the new heath benefit plan. This section does not require coverage of a
service if it is not a covered service under the new health benefit plan.
(2) If a healthcare service, other than for in-patient care, requires prior
authorization and is for the treatment of a covered person's chronic condition,
then the prior authorization shall remain valid for no less than six months from
the date the healthcare provider receives notification of the prior authorization
approval.
…
(o) Violation. – A In accordance with this Chapter, a violation of this section subjects an
insurer and an agent of the insurer to G.S. 58-2-70.
(p) Federal Rule Alignment. – No later than January 1, 2028, an insurer offering a health
benefit plan or a utilization review agent acting on behalf of an insurer offering a health benefit
plan, shall implement and maintain a prior authorization application programming interface
meeting the requirements under 45 C.F.R. § 156.223(b) as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(q) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(r) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(s) Artificial Intelligence. – An artificial intelligence-based algorithm shall not be used
as the sole basis to deny a utilization review determination."
SECTION 8.(b) In accordance with G.S. 135-48.24(b) and G.S. 135-48.30(a)(7)
which require the State Treasurer to implement procedures that are substantially similar to the
provisions of G.S. 58-50-61 for the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State
Employees (State Health Plan), the State Treasurer and the Executive Administrator of the State
Health Plan shall review all practices of the State Health Plan and all contracts with, and practices
of, any third party conducting any utilization review on behalf of the State Health Plan to ensure
compliance with subsection (a) of this section no later than the start of the next plan year.
SECTION 8.(c) Section 8(a) of this act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and
applies to insurance contracts, including contracts with utilization review organizations, issued,
renewed, or amended on or after that date. The remainder of this section is effective when it
becomes law.

PART IX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 316-Fourth Edition Page 15